Washington statutes.
RCW 43.41.405

K-12 data—Securing federal funds.

The education data center and the superintendent of public instruction shall take all actions necessary to secure federal funds to implement RCW 43.41.400, 28A.655.210, and 28A.300.507.

[ 2009 c 548 s 204.]

NOTES:

Intent—2009 c 548: See RCW 28A.150.1981.

Finding—2009 c 548: See note following RCW 28A.410.270.

Intent—Finding—2009 c 548: See note following RCW 28A.305.130.